Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1790.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 9, 1987 (P.L.220, No.39), known as the Social Workers, Marriage and Family Therapists and Professional Counselors Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 6.1. Future Licensed Clinical Social Workers, Licensed Marriage and Family Therapists and Licensed Professional Counselors Grant Program.(a) Establishment of program.--The Future Licensed Clinical Social Workers, Licensed Marriage and Family Therapists and Licensed Professional Counselors Grant Program is established within the agency.1234567891011121314151617181920 (b) Duties of agency.--(1) The agency shall, in consultation with the board, administer the program and award grants on a first-come, first-served basis to individuals who submit a completed application and satisfy the eligibility criteria under paragraph (3). No later than 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph, the agency shall develop an application form that individuals may use to apply for a grant under the program.(2) The agency shall use money appropriated for the purpose of the program and may accept funding from public and private sources, including the Federal Government, for the payment of grants to support individuals completing required hours of supervised clinical experience to become licensed clinical social workers, licensed marriage and family therapists or licensed professional counselors.(3) The agency shall establish eligibility criteria in order for an individual to receive a grant under the program. The eligibility criteria shall include, at a minimum, that an individual:(i) Be a resident of this Commonwealth as defined by the agency.(ii) Meet one of the following requirements:(A) Have received a master's degree in social work or social welfare and be in the process of completing the required hours of supervised clinical experience to become a licensed clinical social worker in accordance with section 7(d)(3).(B) Be licensed as a licensed associate marriage and family therapist and be in the process of 20250HB1790PN2200 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 completing the required hours of supervised clinical experience to become a licensed marriage and family therapist in accordance with section 7(e)(3).(C) Be licensed as a licensed associate professional counselor and be in the process of completing the required hours of supervised clinical experience to become a licensed professional counselor in accordance with section 7(f)(3).(iii) Be ineligible to receive a grant and has not received a grant under section 1318-B of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(iv) Enter into a contract with the agency to work as a licensed clinical social worker, licensed marriage and family therapist or licensed professional counselor in this Commonwealth, following the completion of the individual's required hours of supervised clinical experience needed to become a fully licensed professional, for a period of not less than two years, unless the agency determines that there are extenuating circumstances.(c) Grant amount.--A recipient shall receive a grant under the program of $5,000.(d) Taxability.--For the purposes of computing the tax under Article III of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, the classes of income under section 303 of the Tax Reform Code of 1971 shall not include a payment received by an individual under this section.(e) Number of grants.--An individual may not receive more than one grant under the program.20250HB1790PN2200 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Reports.--(1) No later than September 30, 2026, and each September 30 thereafter, the agency shall issue a report detailing the operation of the program to the extent that money is available to award grants under the program.(2) Each report under this subsection, at a minimum, must include the following information regarding grants under the program for the previous fiscal year:(i) The number of grant applicants.(ii) The number of grants awarded.(iii) The number of grants awarded to individuals seeking to become licensed clinical social workers.(iv) The number of grants awarded to individuals seeking to become licensed marriage and family therapists.(v) The number of grants awarded to individuals seeking to become licensed professional counselors.(3) The agency shall deliver each report under this subsection to:(i) The Governor.(ii) The Secretary of Education.(iii) The Secretary of the Commonwealth.(iv) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Consumer Protection and Professional Licensure Committee of the Senate.(v) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Professional Licensure Committee of the House of Representatives.(vi) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate.20250HB1790PN2200 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives.(4) Each report under this subsection shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the agency.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agency." The Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency."Program." The Future Licensed Clinical Social Workers, Licensed Marriage and Family Therapists and Licensed Professional Counselors Grant Program established under subsection (a)."Supervised clinical experience." Experience as a supervisee in a setting that is organized to prepare an individual for the practice of clinical social work, marriage and family therapy or professional counseling in accordance with the requirements established by the board.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1790PN2200 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516171819